Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 71. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 71.01. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT SAN ANTONIO. The University of Texas at San Antonio is a coeducational institution of higher education in Bexar County. The site of the university shall be on land selected by the board of regents and provided or donated for that purpose.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3165, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 71.02. ORGANIZATION AND CONTROL. The organization and control of The University of Texas at San Antonio is vested in the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3166, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 71.03. COURSES AND DEGREES. The board may prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees. It is the intent of the legislature that those degrees include bachelor's, master's, and doctor's degrees and their equivalents, and that there be established a standard four-year undergraduate program; but no department, school, or degree program may be instituted except with the prior approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3166, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 71.04. OTHER RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board shall make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the university, including the determination of the number of students that shall be admitted to any school, college, or degree-granting program, as may be necessary for the conduct of the university as one of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3166, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 71.05. JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board is specifically authorized to make joint appointments in the university and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any such person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3166, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 71.06. BOARD MAY ACCEPT GRANTS AND GIFTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants or gifts of property, including real estate or money, that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct, and operation of The University of Texas at San Antonio, and in aid of research and teaching at the university. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, or money for the use and benefit of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3166, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.